trunk/apertium-hbs-slv/apertium-hbs-slv.hbs.metadix
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inog</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inoga</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inom</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inomu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inome</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inom</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inomu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inome</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <!--Animate-->
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inih</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Inanimate-->
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inih</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- Feminine-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <e><p><l>ina</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inoj</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inoj</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inu</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ina</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inom</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inih</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- Neuter-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <e><p><l>ino</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inog</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inoga</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inom</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inomu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inome</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inom</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inomu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inome</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ino</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ino</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <e><p><l>ina</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inih</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ina</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ina</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="marij/in__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>in<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p><par n="marij/in__pst__sfx"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vladin"><i>vlad</i><par n="marij/in__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nevladin"><i>nevlad</i><par n="marij/in__adj"/></e>
 <e lm="ženin"><i>žen</i><par n="marij/in__adj"/></e>
